Utah statutes.
53A-10-102.5.   Local school board's responsibilities for an educator evaluation program.

A local school board shall:

(1)  develop an educator evaluation program in accordance with this chapter and support, monitor, and maintain the program; and

(2)  provide for:

(a)  the evaluation of provisional and probationary educators at least twice each school year;

(b)  the ongoing evaluation of all career educators; and

(c)  an orientation on the educator evaluation program.

